Tennessee, session 114, SB2514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 10, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
4-10-123.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall study and prepare a report on arrests made in this state that involved marijuana.
All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to TACIR in
connection with the study. On or before January 31, 2027, TACIR shall report its
findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the
committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over judiciary matters, the
chair of the judiciary committee of the senate, and the legislative librarian. It is the
legislative intent that this study must be conducted from TACIR's existing resources.
(b) The study and report must include:
(1) Arrests made between January 1, 2015, and December 31, 2025;
(2) Demographic data of arrestees, including race, age, and gender; and
(3) Location of each arrest.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2514
012272
- 1 -